tr: Golf aksesuar seti kullanım amacı: Top işaretleme seti; Temizleme kiti; Sopa bakım kiti; Hediye seti; Pratik veya antrenman seti; Putting yardımcı seti; Skor kiti; Tee seti; Seyahat kiti; Diğer
ro-RO: Scopul setului de accesorii de golf: Set pentru marcarea mingii; Kit de curățare; Kit de întreținere pentru crose; Set cadou; Set de practică sau antrenament; Set cu accesorii pentru putting; Kit pentru scor; Set de tee-uri; Kit de călătorie; Altele
it: Scopo del set di accessori da golf: Set marcapalle; Kit di pulizia; Kit di manutenzione per mazze; Set regalo; Set da pratica o allenamento; Set per aiuto nel putt; Kit segnapunti; Set di tee; Kit da viaggio; Altro
pl: Przeznaczenie zestawu akcesoriów golfowych: Zestaw do znakowania piłek; Zestaw do czyszczenia; Zestaw do konserwacji kijów; Zestaw prezentowy; Zestaw do ćwiczeń lub treningu; Zestaw treningowy do puttowania; Zestaw do zapisywania wyników; Zestaw tee; Zestaw podróżny; Inny
ru: Назначение набора аксессуаров для гольфа: Набор для разметки мяча; Набор для чистки; Набор для ухода за клюшками; Подарочный набор; Набор для тренировок или занятий; Набор для отработки паттинга; Набор для ведения счета; Набор ти (колышков); Дорожный набор; Другое
nb: Formål med golftilbehørssettet: Ballmarkeringssett; Rengjøringssett; Vedlikeholdssett for køller; Gavesett; Øvelses- eller treningssett; Sett med puttehjelpemidler; Scoring-sett; Tee-sett; Reisesett; Annet
zh-CN: 高尔夫配件套装用途: 球标套装; 清洁套件; 球杆维护套件; 礼品套装; 练习或训练套装; 推杆辅助套装; 计分套件; 球座套装; 旅行套件; 其他
th: วัตถุประสงค์ของชุดอุปกรณ์กอล์ฟ: ชุดมาร์กลูกกอล์ฟ; ชุดอุปกรณ์ทำความสะอาด; ชุดดูแลรักษาไม้กอล์ฟ; ชุดของขวัญ; ชุดฝึกซ้อม; ชุดอุปกรณ์ช่วยพัตต์; ชุดอุปกรณ์จดคะแนน; ชุดทีออฟ; ชุดอุปกรณ์สำหรับเดินทาง; อื่นๆ
hu: Golffelszerelés- készlet célja: Labdajelölő készlet; Tisztítókészlet; Ütőkarbantartó készlet; Ajándékkészlet; Gyakorló vagy edzőkészlet; Gurítássegítő készlet; Eredményjelző készlet; Tee készlet; Utazókészlet; Egyéb
nl: Golfaccessoireset doel: Balmarkeringsset; Schoonmaakset; Clubonderhoudsset; Cadeauset; Oefen- of trainingsset; Putthulpmiddelset; Scorekit; Teeset; Reisset; Anders
sk-SK: Účel súpravy golfového príslušenstva: Súprava na označovanie loptičiek; Čistiaca súprava; Súprava na údržbu palíc; Darčeková súprava; Cvičná alebo tréningová súprava; Súprava pomôcok na patovanie; Súprava na zaznamenávanie skóre; Súprava týčok; Cestovná súprava; Iné
en: Golf accessory set purpose: Ball marking set; Cleaning kit; Club maintenance kit; Gift set; Practice or training set; Putting aid set; Scoring kit; Tee set; Travel kit; Other
de: Zweck des Golfzubehörsets: Ballmarkier-Set; Reinigungs-Set; Schlägerpflege-Set; Geschenk-Set; Übungs- oder Trainings-Set; Putting-Hilfe-Set; Scoring-Set; Tee-Set; Reise-Set; Andere
el: Σκοπός του σετ αξεσουάρ γκολφ: Σετ σημαδέματος μπάλας; Κιτ καθαρισμού; Κιτ συντήρησης μπαστουνιών; Σετ δώρου; Σετ πρακτικής εξάσκησης ή προπόνησης; Σετ βοηθημάτων putting; Κιτ καταγραφής σκορ; Σετ tee; Κιτ ταξιδιού; Άλλο
cs: Účel sady golfového příslušenství: Sada na značení míčků; Čisticí sada; Sada na údržbu holí; Dárková sada; Cvičná nebo tréninková sada; Sada tréninkových pomůcek na patování; Sada pro zápis skóre; Sada týček; Cestovní sada; Ostatní
ja: ゴルフアクセサリーセットの用途: ボールマーキングセット; クリーニングキット; クラブメンテナンスキット; ギフトセット; 練習またはトレーニングセット; パッティングエイドセット; スコアリングキット; ティーセット; トラベルキット; その他
sv: Syfte med golftillbehörsset: Set för bollmarkering; Rengöringskit; Kit för klubbunderhåll; Presentset; Övnings- eller träningsset; Set med putthjälpmedel; Resultatkit; Tee-set; Resekit; Annat
pt-PT: Finalidade do conjunto de acessórios de golfe: Conjunto de marcação de bolas; Kit de limpeza; Kit de manutenção de tacos; Conjunto de oferta; Conjunto de prática ou treino; Conjunto de ajuda ao putting; Kit de pontuação; Conjunto de tees; Kit de viagem; Outro
pt-BR: Finalidade do conjunto de acessórios de golfe: Conjunto de marcação de bolas; Kit de limpeza; Kit de manutenção de tacos; Conjunto para presente; Conjunto para prática ou treinamento; Conjunto de auxílio para putting; Kit de pontuação; Conjunto de tees; Kit de viagem; Outro
fr: Usage prévu du jeu d’accessoires de golf: Kit de marquage de balles; Kit de nettoyage; Kit d’entretien de clubs; Coffret cadeau; Kit de pratique ou d’entraînement; Kit d’aide au putting; Kit de notation; Ensemble de tees; Kit de voyage; Autre
sl-SI: Namen kompleta dodatkov za golf: Komplet za označevanje žogic; Komplet za čiščenje; Komplet za vzdrževanje palic; Darilni komplet; Komplet za vajo ali trening; Komplet pripomočkov za patanje; Komplet za beleženje rezultatov; Komplet podstavkov (tee); Potovalni komplet; Drugo
es: Conjunto de accesorios de golf: Set para marcar pelotas; Kit de limpieza; Kit de mantenimiento de palos; Set de regalo; Set de práctica o entrenamiento; Set de ayuda para putt; Kit de puntuación; Set de tees; Kit de viaje; Otro
hr-HR: Namjena seta golf pribora: Komplet za označavanje loptica; Komplet za čišćenje; Komplet za održavanje palica; Poklon-paket; Komplet za vježbu ili trening; Komplet pomagala za putting; Komplet za bilježenje rezultata; Komplet teejeva; Putni komplet; Ostalo
bg-BG: Предназначение на комплекта голф аксесоари: Комплект за маркиране на топки; Комплект за почистване; Комплект за поддръжка на стикове; Подаръчен комплект; Комплект за тренировка или упражнения; Комплект с помощни средства за пътинг; Комплект за отчитане на резултат; Комплект тийчета; Комплект за пътуване; Друго
vi: Mục đích sử dụng bộ phụ kiện golf: Bộ đánh dấu bóng; Bộ vệ sinh; Bộ bảo dưỡng gậy; Bộ quà tặng; Bộ dụng cụ tập luyện hoặc huấn luyện; Bộ dụng cụ hỗ trợ gạt bóng; Bộ ghi điểm; Bộ tee; Bộ dụng cụ du lịch; Khác
fi: Golfvarustesetin tarkoitus: Pallon merkkaussarja; Puhdistussarja; Mailojen huoltosarja; Lahjapakkaus; Harjoitussarja; Puttiharjoittelusarja; Pisteytyssarja; Tiisarja; Matkasarja; Muu
ko: 골프 액세서리 세트 용도: 볼 마킹 세트; 클리닝 키트; 클럽 유지보수 키트; 선물 세트; 연습용 또는 훈련용 세트; 퍼팅 보조 세트; 스코어링 키트; 티 세트; 여행용 키트; 기타
da: Formål med golftilbehørssæt: Sæt til boldmarkering; Rengøringssæt; Sæt til vedligeholdelse af køller; Gavesæt; Øve- eller træningssæt; Sæt med putting-hjælpemidler; Scoringssæt; Tee-sæt; Rejsesæt; Andet
zh-TW: 高爾夫配件套組用途: 球標組; 清潔組; 球桿保養組; 禮品組; 練習或訓練組; 推桿輔助組; 記分組; 球座組; 旅行組; 其他
lt-LT: Golfo priedų rinkinio paskirtis: Kamuoliukų žymėjimo rinkinys; Valymo rinkinys; Lazdų priežiūros rinkinys; Dovanų rinkinys; Praktikos ar treniruočių rinkinys; Ridenimo pagalbinis rinkinys; Rezultatų skaičiavimo rinkinys; Stovelių rinkinys; Kelioninis rinkinys; Kita